Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-7437
Facility, defined.

Facility means a physical structure utilized by a wholesale drug distributor for the storage, handling, or repackaging of prescription drugs or the offering of prescription drugs for sale.

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 11.